Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1723.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 13-3602, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-3602. Order of protection; procedure; contents; arrest for violation; penalty; protection order from another jurisdiction; definition A. A person may file a verified petition, as in civil actions, with a magistrate, justice of the peace or superior court judge for an order of protection for the purpose of restraining a person from committing an act included in domestic violence. If the person is a minor, the parent, legal guardian or person who has legal custody of the minor shall file the petition unless the court determines otherwise. The petition shall name the parent, guardian or custodian as the plaintiff and the minor is a specifically designated person for the purposes of subsection G of this section. If a person is either temporarily or permanently unable to request an order, a third party may request an order of protection on behalf of the plaintiff. After the request, the judicial officer shall determine if the third party is an appropriate requesting party for the plaintiff. For the purposes of this section, notwithstanding the location of the plaintiff or defendant, any court in this state may issue or enforce an order of protection. B. An order of protection shall not be granted: 1. Unless the party who requests the order files a written verified petition for an order. 2. Against a person who is less than twelve years of age unless the order is granted by the juvenile division of the superior court. 3. Against more than one defendant. C. The petition shall state the: 1. Name of the plaintiff. The plaintiff's address and contact information shall be disclosed to the court for purposes of service and notification. The address and contact information shall not be listed on the petition. Whether or not the court issues an order of protection, the plaintiff's address and contact information shall be maintained in a separate document or automated database and is not subject to release or disclosure by the court or any form of public access except as ordered by the court. 2. Name and address, if known, of the defendant. 3. Specific statement, including dates, of the domestic violence alleged. 4. Relationship between the parties pursuant to section 13-3601, subsection A and whether there is pending between the parties an action for maternity or paternity, annulment, legal separation or dissolution of marriage. 5. Name of the court in which any prior or pending proceeding or order was sought or issued concerning the conduct that is sought to be restrained. 6. Desired relief. D. A fee shall not be charged for filing a petition under this section or for service of process. Each court shall provide, without charge, forms for purposes of this section for assisting parties without counsel. The court shall make reasonable efforts to provide the appropriate information to both parties on emergency and counseling services that are available in the local area. E. The court shall review the petition, any other pleadings on file and any evidence offered by the plaintiff, including any evidence of harassment by electronic contact or communication, to determine whether the orders requested should issue without further hearing. The court shall issue an order of protection under subsection G of this section if the court determines that there is reasonable cause to believe any of the following: 1. The defendant may commit an act of domestic violence. 2. The defendant has committed an act of domestic violence within the past year or within a longer period of time if the court finds that good cause exists to consider a longer period. F. For the purposes of determining the period of time under subsection E, paragraph 2 of this section, any time that the defendant has been incarcerated or out of this state shall not be counted. If the court denies the requested relief, it may schedule a further hearing within ten days, with reasonable notice to the defendant. G. If a court issues an order of protection, the court may do any of the following: 1. Enjoin the defendant from committing a violation of one or more of the offenses included in domestic violence. 2. Grant one party the use and exclusive possession of the parties' residence on a showing that there is reasonable cause to believe that physical harm may otherwise result. If the other party is accompanied by a law enforcement officer, the other party may return to the residence on one occasion to retrieve belongings. A law enforcement officer is not liable for any act or omission in the good faith exercise of the officer's duties under this paragraph. While the order of protection is in effect, if a party was granted the use and exclusive possession of the parties' residence and subsequently moves out of the house residence, the party must file a notice in writing with the court within five days after moving out of the residence. After receiving the notification from the plaintiff, the court shall provide notice to the defendant that the plaintiff has moved out of the residence and of the defendant's right to request a hearing pursuant to subsection L of this section. 3. Restrain the defendant from contacting the plaintiff or other specifically designated persons and from coming near the residence, place of employment or school of the plaintiff or other specifically designated locations or persons on a showing that there is reasonable cause to believe that physical harm may otherwise result. 4. If the court finds that the defendant is a credible threat to the physical safety of the plaintiff or other specifically designated persons, prohibit the defendant from possessing or purchasing a firearm for the duration of the order. If the court prohibits the defendant from possessing a firearm, the court shall also order the defendant to transfer any firearm owned or possessed by the defendant immediately after service of the order to the appropriate law enforcement agency for the duration of the order. If the defendant does not immediately transfer the firearm, the defendant shall transfer the firearm within twenty-four hours after service of the order. 5. If the order was issued after notice and a hearing at which the defendant had an opportunity to participate, require the defendant to complete a domestic violence offender treatment program that is provided by a facility approved by the department of health services or a probation department or any other program deemed appropriate by the court. 6. Grant relief that is necessary for the protection of the alleged victim and other specifically designated persons and that is proper under the circumstances. 7. Grant the plaintiff the exclusive care, custody or control of any animal that is owned, possessed, leased, kept or held by the plaintiff, the defendant or a minor child residing in the residence or household of the plaintiff or the defendant, and order the defendant to stay away from the animal and forbid the defendant from taking, transferring, encumbering, concealing, committing an act of cruelty or neglect in violation of section 13-2910 or otherwise disposing of the animal. 8. Following a hearing, require the defendant to provide identifying information to the plaintiff, including the defendant's residence, place of employment or vehicle information, on a showing that the defendant has a prior history of harming the plaintiff and there is reasonable cause to believe that without this information physical harm would otherwise result. H. The court shall not grant a mutual order of protection. If opposing parties separately file verified petitions for an order of protection, the courts after consultation between the judges involved may consolidate the petitions of the opposing parties for hearing. This does not prohibit a court from issuing cross orders of protection. I. After granting an order of protection, the court shall provide the order to a law enforcement agency or a constable as set forth in subsection J of this section for service or to an entity that is authorized in subsection K of this section to serve process. The agency or entity serving the order shall provide confirmation of service to the plaintiff as soon as practicable. If service of an order cannot be completed within fifteen days after the agency or entity receives the order, the agency or entity that is attempting service shall notify the plaintiff and continue to attempt service. This notification may be completed by a victim notification system, if available. J. If the order of protection is provided to a law enforcement agency or a constable, service of an order of protection is as follows: 1. For each order of protection that is issued by a municipal court, if the defendant can be served within that city or town, the order shall be served by the law enforcement agency of that city or town. If the order can be served in another city or town, the order shall be served by the law enforcement agency of that city or town. If the order cannot be served within a city or town, the order shall be served by the sheriff or constable of the county in which the defendant can be served. 2. For each order of protection that is issued by a justice of the peace, the order of protection shall be served by the sheriff or constable of the county in which the defendant can be served or by a municipal law enforcement agency. 3. For each order of protection that is issued by a superior court judge or commissioner, the order of protection shall by served by the sheriff or constable of the county where the defendant can be served. K. In addition to persons authorized to serve process pursuant to rule 4(d) of the Arizona rules of civil procedure, a peace officer or a correctional officer as defined in section 41-1661 who is acting in the officer's official capacity may serve an order of protection that is issued pursuant to this section. Service of the order of protection has priority over other service of process that does not involve an immediate threat to the safety of a person. L. At any time during the period during which the order is in effect, a party who is under an order of protection or who is restrained from contacting the other party is entitled to one hearing on written request. No fee may be charged for requesting a hearing. A hearing that is requested by a party who is under an order of protection or who is restrained from contacting the other party shall be held within ten days from the date requested unless the court finds good cause to continue the hearing. If exclusive use of the home is awarded, the hearing shall be held within five days from the date requested. The hearing shall be held at the earliest possible time. An ex parte order that is issued under this section shall state on its face that the defendant is entitled to a hearing on written request and shall include the name and address of the judicial office where the request may be filed. After the hearing, the court may modify, quash or continue the order. If the exclusive use of the home is awarded to the party, the court, on written request of a party, may hold additional hearings at any time if there is a change in circumstances related to the primary residence. After a hearing under this paragraph has been conducted, the superior court in a Title 25 action may modify the order of protection only as to a child who is common to the parties and who is included on the order of protection. such a MODIFICATION may only be made if it is in the best interest of the child, and the modification shall be limited solely to effectuating parenting time orders between the defendant and the common child. M. The order shall include the following statement: Warning This is an official court order. If you disobey this order, you will be subject to arrest and prosecution for the crime of interfering with judicial proceedings and any other crime you may have committed in disobeying this order. N. An order of protection that is not served on the defendant within one year after the date that the order is issued expires. An order is effective on the defendant on service of a copy of the order and petition. An order expires two years after service on the defendant. A modified order is effective on service and expires two years after service of the initial order and petition. O. A supplemental information form that is used by the court or a law enforcement agency solely for the purposes of service of process on the defendant and that contains information provided by the plaintiff is confidential. P. Each affidavit, declaration, acceptance or return of service shall be filed as soon as practicable but not later than seventy-two hours, excluding weekends and holidays, with the clerk of the issuing court or as otherwise required by court rule. This filing shall be completed in person, electronically or by fax. Q. The supreme court shall maintain a central repository for orders of protection. Within twenty-four hours after the affidavit, declaration, acceptance or return of service has been filed, excluding weekends and holidays, the court from which the order or any modified order was issued shall enter the order and proof of service into the supreme court's central repository for orders of protection. The supreme court shall register the order with the national crime information center. The effectiveness of an order does not depend on its registration, and for enforcement purposes pursuant to section 13-2810, a copy of an order of the court, whether or not registered, is presumed to be a valid existing order of the court for a period of two years from the date of service of the order on the defendant. R. A peace officer, with or without a warrant, may arrest a person if the peace officer has probable cause to believe that the person has violated section 13-2810 by disobeying or resisting an order that is issued in any jurisdiction in this state pursuant to this section, whether or not such violation occurred in the presence of the officer. Criminal violations of an order issued pursuant to this section shall be referred to an appropriate law enforcement agency. The provisions for release under section 13-3883, subsection A, paragraph 4 and section 13-3903 do not apply to an arrest made pursuant to this section. For the purposes of this section, any court in this state has jurisdiction to enforce a valid order of protection that is issued in this state and that has been violated in any jurisdiction in this state. S. A person who is arrested pursuant to subsection R of this section may be released from custody in accordance with the Arizona rules of criminal procedure or any other applicable statute. An order for release, with or without an appearance bond, shall include pretrial release conditions that are necessary to provide for the protection of the alleged victim and other specifically designated persons and may provide for any other additional conditions that the court deems appropriate, including participation in any counseling programs available to the defendant. The agency with custody of the defendant shall make reasonable efforts to contact the victim and other specifically designated persons in the order of protection, if known to the custodial agency, who requested notification immediately on release of the arrested person from custody. T. The remedies provided in this section for enforcement of the orders of the court are in addition to any other civil and criminal remedies available. The superior court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to issue orders of protection in all cases if it appears from the petition that an action for maternity or paternity, annulment, legal separation or dissolution of marriage is pending between the parties. A municipal court or justice court shall not issue an order of protection if it appears from the petition that an action for maternity or paternity, annulment, legal separation or dissolution of marriage is pending between the parties. After issuance of an order of protection, if the municipal court or justice court determines that an action for maternity or paternity, annulment, legal separation or dissolution of marriage is pending between the parties, the municipal court or justice court shall stop further proceedings in the action and forward all papers, together with a certified copy of docket entries or any other record in the action, to the superior court where they shall be docketed in the pending superior court action and shall proceed as though the petition for an order of protection had been originally brought in the superior court. Notwithstanding any other law and unless prohibited by an order of the superior court, a municipal court or justice court may hold a hearing on all matters relating to its ex parte order of protection if the hearing was requested before receiving written notice of the pending superior court action. No An order of protection shall not be invalid or determined to be ineffective merely because it was issued by a lower court at a time when an action for maternity or paternity, annulment, legal separation or dissolution of marriage was pending in a higher court. After a hearing with notice to the affected party, the court may enter an order requiring any party to pay the costs of the action, including reasonable attorney fees, if any. An order that is entered by a justice court or municipal court after a hearing pursuant to this section may be appealed to the superior court as provided in title 22, chapter 2, article 4, section 22-425, subsection B and the superior court rules of civil appellate procedure without regard to an amount in controversy. No A fee may not be charged to either party for filing an appeal. For the purposes of this subsection, "pending" means, with respect to an action for annulment, legal separation or dissolution of marriage or for maternity or paternity, either that: 1. An action has been commenced but a final judgment, decree or order has not been entered. 2. A post-decree proceeding has been commenced but a judgment, decree or order finally determining the proceeding has not been entered. U. A peace officer who makes an arrest pursuant to this section or section 13-3601 is not civilly or criminally liable for the arrest if the officer acts on probable cause and without malice. V. A valid protection order that is related to domestic or family violence and that is issued by a court in another state, a court of a United States territory or a tribal court shall be accorded full faith and credit and shall be enforced as if it were issued in this state for as long as the order is effective in the issuing jurisdiction. For the purposes of this subsection: 1. A protection order includes any injunction or other order that is issued for the purpose of preventing violent or threatening acts or harassment against, contact or communication with or physical proximity to another person. A protection order includes temporary and final orders other than support or child custody orders that are issued by civil and criminal courts if the order is obtained by the filing of an independent action or is a pendente lite order in another proceeding. The civil order shall be issued in response to a complaint, petition or motion that was filed by or on behalf of a person seeking protection. 2. A protection order is valid if the issuing court had jurisdiction over the parties and the matter under the laws of the issuing state, a United States territory or an Indian tribe and the person against whom the order was issued had reasonable notice and an opportunity to be heard. If the order is issued ex parte, the notice and opportunity to be heard shall be provided within the time required by the laws of the issuing state, a United States territory or an Indian tribe and within a reasonable time after the order was issued. 3. A mutual protection order that is issued against both the party who filed a petition or a complaint or otherwise filed a written pleading for protection against abuse and the person against whom the filing was made is not entitled to full faith and credit if either: (a) The person against whom an initial order was sought has not filed a cross or counter petition or other written pleading seeking a protection order. (b) The issuing court failed to make specific findings supporting the entitlement of both parties to be granted a protection order. 4. A peace officer may presume the validity of and rely on a copy of a protection order that is issued by another state, a United States territory or an Indian tribe if the order was given to the officer by any source. A peace officer may also rely on the statement of any person who is protected by the order that the order remains in effect. A peace officer who acts in good faith reliance on a protection order is not civilly or criminally liable for enforcing the protection order pursuant to this section. W. For the purposes of this section, "victim notification system" means an automated system that may provide plaintiffs and crime victims with an automated notification regarding the person's case. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 13-3967, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-3967. Release on bailable offenses before trial; definition A. At his appearance before a judicial officer, any person who is charged with a public offense that is bailable as a matter of right shall be ordered released pending trial on his own recognizance or on the execution of bail in an amount specified by the judicial officer. B. In determining the method of release or the amount of bail, the judicial officer, on the basis of available information, shall take into account all of the following: 1. The views of the victim. 2. The nature and circumstances of the offense charged. 3. Whether the accused has a prior arrest or conviction for a serious offense or violent or aggravated felony as defined in section 13-706 or an offense in another state that would be a serious offense or violent or aggravated felony as defined in section 13-706 if committed in this state. 4. Evidence that the accused poses a danger to others in the community. 5. The results of a risk or lethality assessment in a domestic violence charge that is presented to the court. 6. The weight of evidence against the accused. 7. The accused's family ties, employment, financial resources, character and mental condition. 8. The results of any drug test submitted to the court. 9. Whether the accused is using any substance if its possession or use is illegal pursuant to chapter 34 of this title. 10. Whether the accused violated section 13-3407, subsection A, paragraph 2, 3, 4 or 7 involving methamphetamine or section 13-3407.01. 11. The length of residence in the community. 12. The accused's record of arrests and convictions. 13. The accused's record of appearance at court proceedings or of flight to avoid prosecution or failure to appear at court proceedings. 14. Whether the accused has entered or remained in the United States illegally. 15. Whether the accused's residence is in this state, in another state or outside the United States. C. If a judicial officer orders the release of a defendant who is charged with a felony either on his own recognizance or on bail, the judicial officer shall condition the defendant's release on the defendant's good behavior while so released. On a showing of probable cause that the defendant committed any offense during the period of release, a judicial officer may revoke the defendant's release pursuant to section 13-3968. D. After providing notice to the victim pursuant to section 13-4406, a judicial officer may impose any of the following conditions on a person who is released on his own recognizance or on bail: 1. Place the person in the custody of a designated person or organization agreeing to supervise him. 2. Place restrictions on the person's travel, associates or place of abode during the period of release. 3. Require the deposit with the clerk of the court of cash or other security, such deposit to be returned on the performance of the conditions of release. 4. Prohibit the person from possessing any deadly weapon or engaging in certain described activities or indulging in intoxicating liquors or certain drugs. 5. Require the person to report regularly to and remain under the supervision of an officer of the court. 6. Impose any other conditions deemed reasonably necessary to assure appearance as required including a condition requiring that the person return to custody after specified hours. E. In addition to any of the conditions a judicial officer may impose pursuant to subsection D of this section, the judicial officer shall impose both of the following conditions on a person who is charged with a felony violation of chapter 14 or 35.1 of this title or section 13-3212 and who or a felony offense involving domestic violence as defined in section 13-3601 that results in physical harm against another person if the person is released on his own recognizance or on bail: 1. Electronic monitoring where available. 2. A condition prohibiting the person from having any contact with the victim. F. The judicial officer who authorizes the release of the person charged on his own recognizance or on bail shall do all of the following: 1. Issue an appropriate order containing statements of the conditions imposed. 2. Inform the person of the penalties that apply to any violation of the conditions of release. 3. Advise the person that a warrant for his arrest may be issued immediately on any violation of the conditions of release, including the failure to submit to deoxyribonucleic acid testing ordered pursuant to paragraph 4 of this subsection. 4. If the person is charged with a felony or misdemeanor offense listed in section 13-610, subsection O, paragraph 3 and is summoned to appear, order the person to report within five days to the law enforcement agency that arrested the person or to the agency's designee and submit a sufficient sample of buccal cells or other bodily substances for deoxyribonucleic acid testing and extraction. If a person does not comply with an order issued pursuant to this paragraph, the court shall revoke the person's release. G. At any time after providing notice to the victim pursuant to section 13-4406, the judicial officer who orders the release of a person on any condition specified in this section or the court in which a prosecution is pending may amend the order to employ additional or different conditions of release, including either an increase or reduction in the amount of bail. On application, the defendant shall be entitled to have the conditions of release reviewed by the judicial officer who imposed them or by the court in which the prosecution is pending. Reasonable notice of the application shall be given to the county attorney and the victim. H. Any information that is stated or offered in connection with any order pursuant to this section need not conform to the rules pertaining to admissibility of evidence in a court of law. I. This section does not prevent the disposition of any case or class of cases by forfeiture of bail or collateral security if such disposition is authorized by the court. J. A judicial officer who orders the release of a juvenile who is enrolled in a school and who has been transferred to the criminal division of the superior court pursuant to section 8-327 or who has been charged as an adult pursuant to section 13-501 shall notify the appropriate school on the release of the juvenile from custody. K. For the purposes of this section and section 13-3968, "judicial officer" means any person or court authorized pursuant to the constitution or laws of this state to bail or otherwise release a person before trial or sentencing or pending appeal. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 22, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.